Utah statutes.
10-7-86.   Municipality may adopt Utah Procurement Code -- Hiring of professional architect, engineer, or surveyor.

(1)  The governing body of any municipality may adopt any or all of the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, or the rules promulgated pursuant to that code.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the governing body of each municipality that engages the services of a professional architect, engineer, or surveyor and considers more than one such professional for the engagement:

(a)  shall consider, as a minimum, in the selection process:

(i)  the qualifications, experience, and background of each firm submitting a proposal;

(ii)  the specific individuals assigned to the project and the time commitments of each to the project; and

(iii)  the project schedule and the approach to the project that the firm will take; and

(b)  may engage the services of a professional architect, engineer, or surveyor based on the criteria under Subsection (2)(a) rather than solely on lowest cost.

